Tennessee, session 114, SB0206.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 70-4-124(a), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting:
Every person hunting big game except turkey during the gun hunts proclaimed by
the commission shall wear, on both the upper portion of the body and head, outer
garments of daylight fluorescent orange or daylight fluorescent pink color of not less than
a combined five hundred square inches (500 sq. in.) and visible from the front and back.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 70-4-124(b), is amended by deleting
the subsection.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0206
001782
- 1 -